Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1501 of Title 60, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State of Oklahoma shall limit the amount of land owned
by the State of Oklahoma, state agencies, and the federal
government, and shall limit the amount of land encumbered by any
easements, including, but not limited to, conservation easements to
no more than ten percent (10%) of the total land of each county in
the state.
B. The percentage of land owned by the parties mentioned in
subsection A of this section shall be calculated by the county clerk
of each county in this state. County clerks shall refuse to record
Req. No. 10290 Page 1

any instrument which would cause more than ten percent (10%) of the
total land in the county to be owned by or encumbered by parties
mentioned in subsection A of this section.
C. The following are exempt from subsection A of this act:
1. Federal military bases;
2. Flood control lakes or U.S. Army Corps of Engineers
property; and
3. Temporary county real estate holdings that were acquired by
the county for nonpayment of taxes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10290 JL 01/06/25












Req. No. 10290 Page 2